North Carolina, session 2025, HB710.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Program; Purpose. – The State Board of Education shall establish
the Mental Health Crisis Unit Pilot Program (Program) to provide funds to establish at least one
mental health crisis unit in each participating local school administrative unit. The Program shall
commence in the 2025-2026 school year, continue for three years, and expire June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.(b) Participation. – Local school administrative units may submit
applications to the Department of Public Instruction to participate in the Program. The
Department shall select up to eight local school administrative units to participate in the Program
and shall consider at least the following factors when assessing applications:
(1) The level of resources available to the local school administrative unit that
would receive the funds.
(2) The overall impact on student mental health in the local school administrative
unit if that unit were selected to participate in the Program.
(3) The history in the local school administrative unit of sudden traumatic events.
SECTION 1.(c) Implementation. – Each participating local school administrative
unit shall receive two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in each fiscal year in which
funds are made available to establish and maintain at least one mental health crisis unit in the
local school administrative unit. The purpose of a mental health crisis unit is to provide mental
health resources to students and staff and to be on call during school operating hours to provide
rapid response to mental health emergencies that may arise. Participating local school
administrative units shall inform students and staff about any available mental health crisis unit
and provide opportunities to learn about the purposes and function of a mental health crisis unit.
When not deployed during an active crisis or emergency, the crisis unit shall rotate between the
schools of the local school administrative unit on a rotation set by the local board of education.
SECTION 1.(d) Guidelines for Mental Health Crisis Units. – The Department of
Public Instruction, in consultation with the Center for Safer Schools, shall establish standards
and guidelines for the development, operation, and staffing of mental health crisis units pursuant
to the Program, including a requirement that each mental health crisis unit shall be composed of
at least one of each of the following personnel:
(1) School nurse.
(2) School social worker.
*H710-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) School counselor who is a licensed clinical mental health counselor, as
defined in G.S. 90-330(a)(2), or a licensed clinical social worker, as defined
in G.S. 90B-7(d).
SECTION 1.(e) Report. – No later than March 15 of each year in which funds are
made available for the Program, the State Board of Education shall report on the Program to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee. At a minimum, the report shall include the
name of each local school administrative unit that received funds pursuant to the Program and an
assessment of the impact of the Program on the mental health and well-being of students in the
participating local school administrative units.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in
recurring funds to implement the Mental Health Crisis Unit Pilot Program established by this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 710-First Edition